Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3815
Corporation; existence commenced; effect.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of authority, and upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State, the existence of the corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall begin, the articles and bylaws shall become effective, the proposed directors and officers shall take office, and the corporation shall be authorized to offer prepaid dental service plans in this state subject to the requirements and restrictions of sections 44-3801 to 44-3826.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 15.